Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0619

Conflict of interest.

(1) The law applicable to conflicts of interest between a director of an entity organized under Title 23B RCW governs conflicts of interest between a limited cooperative association and a director or member of a committee of the board of directors.

(2) A director does not have a conflict of interest under chapter 23.95 RCW and this chapter or the organic rules solely because the director's conduct relating to the duties of the director may further the director's own interest.

[ 2019 c 37 s 619.]